Indiana, session 2026, SB177.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-47-3-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A person may not waive the requirements
under section 2 of this chapter concerning the return of a firearm
to the rightful owner as part of a plea agreement.
(b) Any purported waiver of the requirements described in
subsection (a) in a plea agreement is invalid and unenforceable as
against public policy.
2026 IN 177—LS 6835/DI 144